Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.340

Alien banks or branches in business on or before effective date.

(1) Any branch of an alien bank that is conducting business in this state on July 16, 1973 pursuant to RCW 30A.04.300 shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter, and shall continue to conduct its business pursuant to RCW 30A.04.300.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, any alien bank that is conducting business in this state on July 16, 1973 shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, That any such alien bank which has operated an agency or similar operation in this state for at least the five years immediately preceding such effective date shall not be denied a certificate to operate an agency.

[ 2014 c 37 s 222; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 34. Formerly RCW 30.42.340.]